Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1075XS (2) 91 da/ns S.F. 31 Section 1. Section 147A.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Provide veterinary medical services by 3 diagnosing or treating a severely injured police service dog 4 as provided in section 169.4. 5 Sec. 2. Section 169.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 17. a. An emergency medical care provider 8 certified pursuant to chapter 147A who elects to provide 9 veterinary medical services by diagnosing or treating a police 10 service dog, if all of the following apply: 11 (1) The police service dog was on duty under the supervision 12 of a peace officer as defined in section 801.4. 13 (2) The police service dog suffered a severe injury. 14 (3) The veterinary medical services are necessary to 15 immediately stabilize the police service dogâs condition for 16 later diagnosis or treatment by a licensed veterinarian or the 17 holder of a valid temporary permit. 18 b. An emergency medical care provider certified pursuant 19 to chapter 147A may elect not to provide veterinary medical 20 services under paragraph âaâ . 21 c. If an emergency medical care provider certified pursuant 22 to chapter 147A elects to provide veterinary medical services 23 under paragraph âaâ , all of the following apply: 24 (1) The emergency medical care provider shall diagnose or 25 treat the police service dog only after diagnosing or treating 26 any injured human at the scene of the emergency. 27 (2) The emergency medical care provider shall not be civilly 28 liable for diagnosing or treating the police service dog if the 29 emergency medical care provider acted reasonably and in good 30 faith. 31